Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2052
Physician assistants; misrepresentation; penalty.

Any person who has not been licensed by the department, with the recommendation of the board, and who holds himself or herself out as a physician assistant, or who uses any other term to indicate or imply that he or she is a physician assistant, shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1973, LB 101, § 7;

R.S.Supp.,1973, § 85-179.10;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 319;

Laws 1985, LB 132, § 7;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,107.21;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 710.